Utah statutes.
78B-7-306.   Immunity.
This state or a local governmental agency, or a law enforcement officer,
prosecuting attorney, clerk of court, or any state or local governmental
official acting in an official capacity, is immune from civil and criminal
liability for an act or omission arising out of the registration or
enforcement of a foreign protection order or the detention or arrest of an
alleged violator of a foreign protection order if the act or omission was done
in good faith in an effort to comply with this part.
